Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.38.080

Application of Washington laws—Declaration of invalidity.

(1) The laws of Washington applicable to Washington state banks regarding community reinvestment, consumer protection, fair lending, and the establishment of intrastate branches apply to any branch in Washington of an out-of-state national bank or out-of-state state bank to the same extent as Washington laws apply to a Washington state bank. In lieu of taking action directly against an out-of-state state bank to enforce compliance with these Washington laws on host state branches, the director may refer action to the home state regulator, but the director retains enforcement powers to ensure that compliance is satisfactory to the director.

(2) Any host state branch of a Washington state bank shall comply with all applicable host state laws concerning community reinvestment, consumer protection, fair lending, and the establishment of intrastate branches.

(3) In the event that the responsible federal chartering authority, pursuant to applicable federal law, or in the event a court of competent jurisdiction declares that any Washington state law is invalid with respect to an out-of-state or national bank, that Washington state law is also invalid with respect to Washington state banks and to host branches of out-of-state state banks to that same extent. The director may, from time to time, publish by rule Washington state laws that have been found invalidated pursuant to federal law and procedures. This subsection does not impair, in any manner, the authority of the state attorney general to enforce antitrust laws applicable to banks, bank holding companies, or affiliates of those banks or bank holding companies.

[ 1996 c 2 s 18. Formerly RCW 30.38.080.]